Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Chapter 5

Court of Criminal Appeals

16-5-101. Court of criminal appeals established.

There is created and established an appellate court in this state to be designated and styled the court of criminal appeals of Tennessee.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-441.

Cross-References. Power of general assembly to create courts, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 21.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure (Michael R. Tilley), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90.

The Tennessee Court of Appeals: How Often It Corrects the Trial Courts — and Why, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 557 (2001).

The Tennessee Court of Criminal Appeals: A Study and Analysis (Daniel J. Foley), 66 Tenn. L. Rev. 427 (1999).

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Criminal Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Comparative Legislation. Court of criminal appeals:

Ala. Code § 12-3-1 et seq.

Cited: Columbia Bonding Co. v. State, 225 Tenn. 719, 476 S.W.2d 633, 1972 Tenn. LEXIS 306 (1972); Galbreath v. Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility of the Supreme Court of Tenn., 121 S.W.3d 660, 2003 Tenn. LEXIS 1220 (Tenn. 2003).

16-5-102. Judges — Qualifications.

The court of criminal appeals shall be composed of twelve (12) judges, of whom no more than four (4) shall reside in any grand division of the state. Immediately preceding appointment, each judge shall be at least thirty (30) years of age, shall have been a resident of the state for at least five (5) consecutive years, shall have been a resident of the grand division from which the judge is appointed for at least one (1) year. For purposes of this section, “resident” has the same meaning as defined in § 2-1-104. The judges shall be duly licensed to practice law in this state.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 2; 1969, ch. 330, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 636, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-442; Acts 1996, ch. 847, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the second sentence which read: “Each judge shall not be less than thirty (30) years of age and shall have been a citizen and resident of the state for at least five (5) years prior to appointment or election under this chapter.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch.1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court of Criminal Appeals: A Study and Analysis (Daniel J. Foley), 66 Tenn. L. Rev. 427 (1999).

Attorney General Opinions. Factors used to determine residency status, OAG 95-019 (3/27/95).

Cited: Nix v. State, 1 Tenn. Crim. App. 517, 446 S.W.2d 266, 1969 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 338 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1969); McGee v. State, 2 Tenn. Crim. App. 100, 451 S.W.2d 709, 1969 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 356 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1969).

16-5-103. Election of judges — Oath.

The judges of the court of criminal appeals shall be elected by the qualified voters of the state in a statewide retention election conducted in accordance with title 17, chapter 4, part 1. Vacancies on the court of criminal appeals shall be filled by the governor in accordance with title 17, chapter 4, part 1.

Their oath of office shall be filed and entered on the minutes of the court in the particular grand division from which the judge has been appointed or elected. The oath shall likewise be filed and entered on the records in the office of the secretary of state at Nashville.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 3; 1969, ch. 330, § 3; 1976, ch. 636, § 2; modified; T.C.A., § 16-443; Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment in (a), substituted “of the state in a statewide retention election conducted in accordance with title 17, chapter 4, part 1.” for “for a full term of eight (8) years at the same time the regular judicial election is held in this state for the judges of the other courts of record.” and added the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch.1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Criminal Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

16-5-104. Limitation of requirements for office.

A judge of the court of criminal appeals shall only be required to qualify as a candidate and be elected by the qualified voters of the state.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 4; modified; T.C.A., § 16-444.

Cross-References. Judges, qualifications, § 16-5-102.

16-5-105. Compensation and expenses — Inability of judge to serve — Replacement.

The compensation of the judges of the court of criminal appeals shall be the same as that received by the judges of the court of appeals.

The necessary travel expense and per diem allowance incurred by the judges in the performance of their official duties under this part shall be paid and reimbursed by the state in the same manner as authorized for the judges of the supreme court and court of appeals.

When a judge of the court of criminal appeals is unable to perform the duties of office on account of absence, sickness, disqualification or other disability, the judge or the clerk of the court shall advise the chief justice of the supreme court of the inability to serve and when so advised, the chief justice may assign a judge of the supreme court, a judge of the court of appeals, a circuit or criminal judge or chancellor or a retired judge of any of those courts to the court of criminal appeals to serve such time as the chief justice may direct, except when it appears to the chief justice that the absence, sickness, disqualification or other disability of a judge of the court of criminal appeals may be protracted, the chief justice shall certify this fact to the governor and the governor shall have the power to commission a person to fill the vacancy during the inability of the judge to serve.

The compensation and expense allowance for the appointed judges shall be the same as for regular judges with proper adjustments being made in the compensation of retired judges or judges of trial courts when serving on the court of criminal appeals so that the maximum received by them will not exceed the pay of the regular judges.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 5; 1968, ch. 414, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-445.

Cross-References. Court of appeals judges, compensation, § 16-4-103.

Court of appeals, payment of expenses, § 16-4-107.

Supreme court, payment of expenses, § 16-3-103.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Criminal Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Collateral References.

Substitution of judge in state criminal trial. 45 A.L.R.5th 591.

16-5-106. Election of presiding judge — Rules of practice — Special meetings.

The members of the court at the first meeting of the court, after each judicial election, shall choose one (1) of its members as presiding judge of the court of criminal appeals.

The court at its first meeting under this section shall have the authority to adopt and promulgate its own rules of practice, and the rules may be revised from time to time as the court deems advisable and proper.

The presiding judge shall, upon a request of a majority of the members, call special meetings of the court for the purpose of revising or reconsidering its rules of practice, or for any other purpose that may be desired.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 6; T.C.A., § 16-446.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Criminal Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

16-5-107. Places of sitting — Terms — Out of term sittings — Panels and en banc sessions — Majority required for decisions.

The court of criminal appeals shall sit at Knoxville, Nashville, Jackson and such other places as the presiding judge may from time to time designate for the purpose of hearing and deciding cases and such other matters as may come before it for its consideration and determination.

The regular terms of the court of criminal appeals shall be the fourth Monday in June at Knoxville; the third Monday in February at Nashville; and the second Monday in October at Jackson.

The court of criminal appeals may sit at such places as the presiding judge may designate without reference to terms, for the purpose of hearing and deciding cases and other matters before it, and for such period of time as may in the judgment of the court be necessary or required for the prompt and orderly dispatch of the business before the court at such time.

The court of criminal appeals shall sit in panels of three (3) judges. The court may sit en banc, or in panels of five (5) or seven (7) judges, at any regular or special term, in the discretion of the presiding judge thereof, entered upon the minutes of the particular court in each instance. In each such event, the concurrence of a majority of the judges so sitting shall be necessary to constitute a decision of the court.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 7; 1969, ch. 330, § 4; 1973, ch. 395, § 1; 1974, ch. 520, § 1; 1976, ch. 636, § 3; T.C.A., § 16-447; Acts 1996, ch. 704, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Criminal Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Cited: Ramey v. Russell, 299 F. Supp. 947, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 8599 (E.D. Tenn. 1969); Weaver v. State, 4 Tenn. Crim. App. 435, 472 S.W.2d 898, 1971 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 508 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1971); Taylor v. State, 4 Tenn. Crim. App. 524, 474 S.W.2d 160, 1971 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 414 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1971).

16-5-108. Jurisdiction.

The jurisdiction of the court of criminal appeals shall be appellate only, and shall extend to review of the final judgments of trial courts in:

Criminal cases, both felony and misdemeanor;

Habeas corpus and Post-Conviction Procedure Act proceedings attacking the validity of a final judgment of conviction or the sentence in a criminal case, and other cases or proceedings instituted with reference to or arising out of a criminal case;

Civil or criminal contempt arising out of a criminal matter; and

Extradition cases.

The court or any judge of the court shall also have jurisdiction to grant petitions for certiorari and supersedeas in proper cases within its jurisdiction as provided by law.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 8; 1971, ch. 156, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-448; Acts 1989, ch. 40, § 1; 1994, ch. 609, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 40, § 4 provided that any action pending on July 1, 1989, shall be maintained under law prior to the 1989 amendment by that act until its final disposition.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 12.48, 33.100.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 16, 30; 4 Tenn. Juris., Bail and Recognizance, § 11; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 21.

Law Reviews.

Appellate and Post Conviction Relief in Tennessee (Ronald W. Eades), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

Criminal Appeals as of Right in Tennessee (W. Mark Ward), 31 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 19 (1995).

“Seeking Justice on Appeal,” 27 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 28 (1991).

The Tennessee Court of Criminal Appeals: A Study and Analysis (Daniel J. Foley), 66 Tenn. L. Rev. 427 (1999).

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Criminal Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

16-5-109. Clerks and marshals — Appeal fees and court costs.

The clerks and marshals of the supreme court shall also act and be the clerks and marshals of the court of criminal appeals. They shall perform the same duties and functions with respect to the court of criminal appeals and be subject to the same liabilities as may be prescribed by law. The appeal fees and court costs in the court of criminal appeals shall be the same as authorized by law, and neither the clerks nor marshals shall receive any additional compensation for their services as clerks and marshals of the court of criminal appeals.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 9; T.C.A., § 16-449.

Cross-References. Fees, § 8-21-501.

Supreme court clerks, title 18, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Criminal Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Cited: State v. Watts, 670 S.W.2d 246, 1984 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 2332 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1984).

16-5-110. Transfer and docketing of cases.

All cases appealed to the court of criminal appeals for the purpose of review shall be filed and docketed with the clerk of the court of criminal appeals for the grand division within which the case arose. All appeal cases originating in the western grand division shall be filed with the clerk of the court of criminal appeals at Jackson. All cases from the middle grand division shall be filed with the clerk of the court at Nashville, and all cases originating in the eastern grand division shall be filed with the clerk of the court at Knoxville.

The court of criminal appeals, in its discretion, may transfer any case, appeal record, or any other matter of business coming before the court from one grand division to another grand division for hearing when the respective parties agree to the transfer. Upon application or motion by either of the parties for the case to be transferred to another grand division, the court, in its discretion, may issue an order of transfer when it finds the ends of justice require, and the transfer is necessary and proper to safeguard the interest of the respective parties or in the interest of the general public welfare.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 10; modified; T.C.A., § 16-450; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 17.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, II. Initiation of an Appeal (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 4.

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, V. Briefs (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 69.

16-5-111. Effect of judgments.

The court of criminal appeals is a court of record, and its judgment shall be executed as provided in the Tennessee rules of appellate procedure.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 11; T.C.A., § 16-451; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 39(b), 39(f), 42(a), 42(b).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12.

Law Reviews.

Appellate and Post Conviction Relief in Tennessee (Ronald W. Eades), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, VII. Disposition of Appeals (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 90.

Cited: Cole v. State, 223 Tenn. 20, 442 S.W.2d 246, 1969 Tenn. LEXIS 385 (1969); Rose v. Hodges, 423 U.S. 19, 96 S. Ct. 175, 46 L. Ed. 2d 162, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 93 (1975).

16-5-112. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-5-112 (Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 12; 1975, ch. 75, § 1; 1975, ch. 77, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-452) concerning certiorari from the supreme court was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 1(1). For present provisions, see T.R.A.P. 11.

16-5-113. Office space for judges — Rental allowance — Secretaries — Salaries and travel expense.

Each judge of the court of criminal appeals shall be furnished office space in the county of the judge's residence by the state. In the event no office space is available either from the state or county, then each judge shall receive the same monthly allowance from the state as authorized by law for office rental expense. Likewise, each judge of the court of criminal appeals shall have a secretary, and the salary and travel expense allowance of the secretary shall be the same as authorized by law for the secretary of each judge of the court of appeals.

Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 13; T.C.A., § 16-453.